Wyoming statutes. Title 28 Legislature
Article 2. Select Committee on Capital Financing and Investments

§ 28-11-201.
Appointment of members; powers and duties.

Not later than March 31 following each general election, the president of the senate shall appoint six (6) members of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint six (6) members of the house to a select committee on capital financing and investments. Appointments to the committee by each presiding officer shall reflect as nearly as possible the percentage of the elected membership of the majority and minority parties of each house, provided that not more than five (5) members appointed by each presiding officer shall be from the same political party.

The select committee shall:

Select from among its members a chairman and vice-chairman;

Monitor the establishment and implementation of state investment policy by the state loan and investment board under W.S.

9-4-716

, including the extent to which investment goals are being achieved;

Monitor the establishment and implementation of state capital financing policy by the state building commission and any other state entity charged with capital financing;

Prepare and submit recommendations to the legislature, including sponsoring legislation, to improve statutes related to the investment of state and local government funds;

Develop knowledge and expertise among its members regarding issues related to investment of public funds and capital financing;

Monitor state funds invested for a specific public purpose authorized or directed by the legislature.

The state loan and investment board shall:

Provide the select committee with notice and minutes of all board meetings. The select committee and the board may hold joint meetings;

Provide information to the select committee upon request to assist the select committee to monitor progress.

The select committee may:

Secure consulting services, if necessary, to provide technical assistance regarding state investment policy;

Review budgets and expenditures related to any aspect of state investment policy and its implementation;

Review budgets and expenditures related to any aspect of state capital financing policy and its implementation.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 9, § 1; 2000, ch. 20, § 1; 2008, ch. 113, § 2; 2011, ch. 198, § 1; 2016 ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “W.S.

9-4-716

” for “W.S.

9-4-709

” in (b)(ii).

The 2011 amendment,

in (a), substituted “31” for “15,” and the present second sentence for the previous one, which read: “Not more than four (4) members from each house shall be from the same political party.”

Laws 2011, ch. 198 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2011.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, added (b)(vi).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2011, ch. 198, § 2, provides:

“Commencing with the sixty-first legislature, the membership of every committee subject to this act shall be apportioned in accordance with this act.”